test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-06tikw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tikõ: # Noun (6) tikõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Nom: tikõ
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Gen: tikõ
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Par: tikõt
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ill: tikkõhe
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Gen: tikkidõ
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Par: tikkit
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ill: tikkihe
     tikõ+Hom1+A+Pl+All: tikkilõ
